Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 8

Carroll County Watershed Authority

64-1-801. Creation — Purpose.

There is hereby created the Carroll County watershed authority to exercise the powers granted in this part in and with respect to all of Carroll County.

The Carroll County watershed authority, cited as the “authority” in this part, shall be a body politic and corporate.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 1; 2000, ch. 958, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Carroll County watershed authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

64-1-802. Board of directors.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of six (6) members appointed by the governor.

Members of the board of directors shall be citizens of Tennessee and residents of Carroll County.

Terms of members of the board shall be six (6) years, except that in the initial appointments two (2) members shall be appointed to two-year terms, two (2) members shall be appointed to four-year terms, and two (2) members shall be appointed to six-year terms.

Vacancies shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term.

The board shall elect a chair for a term of two (2) years and such other officers for similar terms as it finds necessary.

Members of the board may be reappointed and officers of the board may be reelected.

The board shall meet at least quarterly in Huntingdon, but may meet at such other times and places as the board may determine. Emergency meetings may be called by the chair on the chair's own initiative or upon petition by a majority of the board.

A quorum of the board, which shall be four (4) members, shall be necessary for the transaction of any business.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (i)(1).

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 2; 2020, ch. 662, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 662, § 6. April 2, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The Carroll County watershed authority is a state agency for liability purposes, OAG 02-077, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/28/02).

64-1-803. Executive secretary and personnel.

The board may employ an executive secretary and such other persons as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes stated in this part, and the salary of any such employees may be paid out of such funds as may be available to the authority from any source. The executive secretary shall be the custodian of funds belonging to the authority, and shall keep such records and accounts as may be required by the board. The executive secretary shall also execute a corporate surety bond as prescribed by the board.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 3.

64-1-804. Powers and duties.

The authority is specifically authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary in forming and executing a plan for the comprehensive development of the resources of Carroll County, including an action in cooperation, when necessary, with appropriate local, state, and federal agencies in the fields of agriculture, forestry, drainage and flood control, land reclamation, electric power utilization, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, public health, manufacturing, and trade. To that end the authority:

Shall have succession in its corporate name;

May sue and be sued in its corporate name;

May adopt and use a corporate seal;

May establish, amend and repeal bylaws and make all rules and regulations deemed expedient for the management of its corporate affairs;

May make contracts and execute instruments containing such terms, provisions and conditions as in the judgment of the board of directors may be necessary, proper or advisable in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it in this section, including, but not limited to, contracts for grants, loans or other assistance from any federal agency and contracts with corporations, associations or individuals for construction work in the furtherance of any development project, and may carry out and perform the terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

May acquire by purchase, lease, gift or by condemnation property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, that the board deems necessary to the exercise of its powers or functions; provided, that acquisition by condemnation is limited to land, rights in land, including leaseholds and easements, and water rights in watersheds of rivers or streams in Carroll County that, if taken for channel improvement along an unimpounded portion of such rivers or streams, lie within the present floodplain of such rivers or streams and, if bordering an impoundment or detention reservoir, lie within two thousand six hundred fifty feet (2,650') of the nearest point on the maximum shoreline contour of such impoundment. The amount and character of interests in land, rights in land and water rights to be acquired within either of these boundaries shall be determined by the board of directors, which determination shall be final;

May:

Issue its bonds, including refunding bonds, from time to time in a total amount not to exceed twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition of necessary land or interests in such land and the development of the resources of Carroll County, and expenses incidental to such development;

Issue refunding bonds which refinance or refund bonds used for any purpose described in subdivision (a)(7)(A);

Secure such bonds by a pledge of all or any part of the revenues that may come to the authority from any source, by a mortgage or deed of trust of the authority's land or any part of such land, or by a combination of the two (2); and

Make such contracts or covenants in the issuance of such bonds as may be necessary to ensure the marketability of the bonds;

May arrange with any city, county, municipality or supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation or other adjustment of roads, highways, bridges and utility lines;

May enter into contracts with municipalities, corporations, other public agencies, or political subdivisions of any kind, or with others for the sale of water from reservoirs in the rivers or streams of Carroll County under its control for municipal, domestic, agricultural or industrial use or any other services, facilities or commodities that the authority may be in a position to supply;

May develop reservoirs and shoreline lands for recreational use and provide for their operation or use for this purpose directly or by concessionaires, lessees or vendees of shoreline lands;

May sell or lease shoreline lands acquired in connection with development of the rivers or streams of Carroll County for uses consistent with the authority's development plans and subject to such restrictions as the authority deems necessary for reservoir protection and to such requirements as to:

Character of improvements and activities on the lands; and

Time within which such improvements or activities shall be undertaken as the authority deems appropriate to its overall development plans; and

May manage or operate reservoirs or shoreline lands of reservoirs owned by the United States under appropriate agreements with the federal agency or agencies having custody and control thereof.

It is recognized that parts of Carroll County are within the watersheds of the Obion and Forked Deer Rivers. Nothing in this section or this part should be construed as giving the Carroll County watershed authority power that conflicts with the power of the West Tennessee basin authority created by part 11 of this chapter. In the event of any disagreement between these two (2) agencies over activities in the Obion or Forked Deer River Basins, the determination of the West Tennessee River basin authority shall prevail.

The authority shall not exercise any broad governmental controls or police powers to regulate land use planning, zoning, subdivision regulations, building codes, or similar powers to regulate land use.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 4; 2000, ch. 958, §§ 2-5; 2008, ch. 970, § 1; 2014, ch. 577, § 1; 2020, ch. 662, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Act 2014, ch. 577, § 2 provided that the authority may issue refunding bonds in order to refinance or refund bonds which were issued prior to March 28, 2014.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read: “(a) The authority is specifically authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary in forming and executing a plan for the comprehensive development of the resources of Carroll County, including an action in cooperation, when necessary, with appropriate local, state, and federal agencies in the fields of agriculture, forestry, drainage and flood control, land reclamation, electric power utilization, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, public health, manufacturing, and trade. To that end the authority:” and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 662, § 6. April 2, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The Carroll County watershed authority is a state agency for liability purposes, OAG 02-077, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/28/02).

Authority of Carroll County watershed to issue bonds. OAG 13-47, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (6/28/13).

64-1-805. Eminent domain.

The authority's power of eminent domain may be exercised under title 29, chapter 16 or pursuant to any other applicable statutory provisions, now in force or hereafter enacted, for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

At any time on or after the filing of a petition for condemnation of property and before the entry of final judgment, the authority may file with the clerk of the court in which the petition is filed a declaration of taking signed by the duly authorized officer or agent of the authority declaring that all or part of the property described in the petition is being taken for the use of the authority. The declaration of taking shall be sufficient if it sets forth:

A description of the property, sufficient for the identification thereof, to which there may be attached a plat or map thereof;

A statement of the estate or interest in property being taken; and

A statement of the sum of money estimated by the authority to be just compensation for the property taken.

At any time prior to the vesting of title to property in the authority, the authority may withdraw or dismiss its petition with respect to any and all of the property described in the petition.

From the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit in court to the use of the persons entitled thereto of the amount of the estimated compensation stated in the declaration, title to the property described as being taken by the declaration shall vest in the authority, free from the right, title, interest or lien of all parties to the cause. The property shall be deemed to be condemned and taken for the use of the authority, and the right to just compensation for the same shall vest in the persons entitled thereto. Upon the filing of the declaration of taking, the court shall designate a day, not exceeding twenty (20) days after such filing except upon good cause shown, on which the persons in possession shall be required to surrender possession to the authority.

The ultimate amount of compensation shall be determined pursuant to title 29, chapter 16. If the amount so fixed exceeds the amount so deposited in the court by the authority or otherwise paid to the persons entitled to compensation, the court shall enter judgment against the authority in the amount of such deficiency, together with interest at the legal rate on such deficiency from the date of the vesting of title to the date of entry of the final judgment, subject, however, to abatement for use, income, rents or profits derived from such property by the owner thereof subsequent to the vesting of title in the authority; and the court shall order the authority to deposit the amount of such deficiency in court. Upon the application of the parties in interest, the court may order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings. Interest shall not be allowed on so much of the just compensation as has been paid into court with the declaration of taking. In case the amount deposited in court by the authority as the estimated compensation for the property exceeds the amount of the final award or judgment, such excess shall be returned to the authority.

As an alternative to the procedure provided in subsections (a)-(d), the authority may file in the court where condemnation proceedings of the authority are pending, an application for a writ of possession, which the court shall, upon the authority's posting a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property condemned, order that a writ of possession issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 5.

64-1-806. Exemption from taxation.

During the time that title to land or rights in land are held by the authority, they are exempt from all taxes levied by the state or any of its political subdivisions or instrumentalities of either; and all other property and activities of the authority are similarly exempt.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. The Carroll County watershed authority is a state agency for liability purposes, OAG 02-077, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/28/02).

64-1-807. Cooperation of state agencies.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized, empowered and directed to extend their cooperation and assistance to the authority in the formulation and implementation of its program of development.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 7.

64-1-808. Cooperation with Tennessee Valley authority and other agencies — Reports.

The authority is further authorized to:

Cooperate with the Tennessee Valley authority in a study of engineering works as part of plans for comprehensive development of the streams and rivers of Carroll County and in a study of the economic effects of such works in terms of agricultural production, industrial locations, trade, land values and county and state tax revenues;

Ascertain the availability of, and to obtain to the extent possible, commitments from local interests for financial contributions toward the cost of constructing, operating and maintaining such works;

Negotiate with the Tennessee Valley authority regarding assistance by that agency in planning and financing such works;

Report to the governor on plans that may be developed for constructing, operating and maintaining the projects, including recommendations for further legislation to put such plan into effect; and

Cooperate with other groups authorized to investigate state participation in federal water projects.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 8; 2000, ch. 958, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. The Carroll County watershed authority is a state agency for liability purposes, OAG 02-077, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/28/02).

64-1-809. Local contributions to authority — Tax levy.

Carroll County and any city or town in Carroll County are hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the work of the Carroll County watershed development authority any amount or amounts as recommended by the authority that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective county or city.

The county legislative bodies and governing bodies of such cities or towns are empowered to levy and collect ad valorem taxes for such purposes, which are hereby declared to be for municipal and county public purposes.

Acts 1984, ch. 680, § 9; 2000, ch. 958, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. The Carroll County watershed authority is a state agency for liability purposes, OAG 02-077, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/28/02).